Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-652
Home health agency; funding authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services may (1) charge and receive fees, (2) accept third-party reimbursements or matching funds from any federal governmental agency, private corporation, or other public or private organization or entity, and (3) accept grants or donations from any public or private agency, organization, or entity for services provided by any home health agency operated by the department. Such funds shall be paid to the state treasury and credited to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 389, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 850;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 740.